Maryland, session 2025, HB1073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
7–106.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “MAIL OR PACKAGE” MEANS AN ITEM DELIVERED OR
LEFT TO BE COLLECTED BY THE UNITED STATES POSTAL SERVICE OR A DELIVERY
SERVICE COMPANY THAT DELIVERS TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY OR WILLFULLY AND WITHOUT
PERMISSION OF THE INTENDED RECIPIENT OF THE MAIL OR PACKAGE OBTAIN OR
EXERT CONTROL OVER MAIL OR A PACKAGE DELIVERED TO ANOTHER WITH THE
INTENT TO DEPRIVE THE OWNER OF THE MAIL OR PACKAGE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1073*

HOUSE BILL 1073
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND
ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.